Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-3214
Respiratory care service; requirements.

Any health care facility or home care agency providing inpatient or
outpatient respiratory care service shall designate a medical director, who
shall be a licensed physician who has special interest and knowledge in the
diagnosis and treatment of respiratory problems. Such physician shall (1)
be an active medical staff member of a licensed health care facility, (2)
whenever possible be qualified by special training or experience in the management
of acute and chronic respiratory disorders, and (3) be competent to monitor
and assess the quality, safety, and appropriateness of the respiratory care
services which are being provided. The medical director shall be accessible
to and assure the competency of respiratory care practitioners and shall require
that respiratory care be ordered by a licensed physician, a licensed physician assistant, a nurse
practitioner as defined in section 38-2312, or a certified registered nurse
anesthetist as defined in section 38-704, who has medical responsibility
for any patient that needs such care.

Laws 1986, LB 277, § 11;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-1,229;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 1080;

Laws 2012, LB788, § 1.